Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 8 Rhode Island Coordinate System

34-8-1.
Adoption of ocean and geodetic survey systems.

The two (2) systems of plane coordinates which have been established by the national ocean/national geodetic survey, or its successors, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the state are hereafter to be known and designated as the “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927” and the “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-1

; P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 1.

34-8-2.
Use of term in documents.

The use of the term “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927” or “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983” on any map, report of survey, or other document, shall be limited to coordinates based on the Rhode Island coordinate system as defined in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-2

; P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 1.

34-8-3.
Location of point by coordinates.

The plane coordinate values for a point on the earth’s surface, to be used to express the geographic position or location of such point on the Rhode Island coordinate system, shall consist of two (2) distances, expressed in U.S. survey feet and decimals of a survey foot when using the Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927, and expressed in meters and decimals of a meter when using the Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983. One of these distances, to be known as the “x-coordinate”, shall give the position in an east and west direction; the other, to be known as the “y-coordinate”, shall give the position in a north and south direction. These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to plane rectangular coordinate values for the monumented points of the North American horizontal geodetic control network as published by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey or its successors, and whose plane coordinates have been computed on the systems defined in this chapter. Any such station may be used for establishing a survey connection to either Rhode Island coordinate system set forth in §

34-8-1

of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-3

; P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 1.

34-8-4.
Technical definition of systems — Origin of coordinates.

For purposes of more precisely defining the Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927, the following definition by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey is adopted:

The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 71° 30´ west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 71° 30´ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41° 05´ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

For the purposes of more precisely defining the Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983, the following definition by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey is adopted:

The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983 is a transverse Mercator projection of the North American datum of 1983 having a central meridian 71° 30´ west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 71° 30´ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41° 05´ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 100,000 meters, and y = 100,000 meters, and y = 0 meters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-4

; P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 1.

34-8-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-5

; Repealed by P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 2.

34-8-6.
Proximity to established station required for use of coordinates in public records.

No coordinates based on either Rhode Island coordinate system, purporting to define the position of a point on land boundary, shall be presented to be recorded in any public land records or deed records unless such point is within one kilometer of a monumented horizontal control station and unless minimum THIRD ORDER — class II procedures are used in conformity with the standards of accuracy and specifications prepared and published by the federal geodetic control committee established in conformity with the standards of accuracy and specifications for first — or second-order geodetic surveying as prepared and published by the federal geodetic control committee (FGCC) of the United States department of commerce. Standards and specifications of the FGCC or its successor in force on date of the survey shall apply. The publishing of the existing control stations, or the acceptance with intent to publish the newly established control stations, by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey will constitute evidence of adherence to the FGCC specifications. Above limitations may be modified by the Rhode Island department of transportation land surveying section to meet local conditions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-6

; P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 1.

34-8-7.
Reliance on system not required — Describing location of survey system or land boundary corner.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall require any purchaser or mortgagee of real property to rely wholly on a land description, any part of which depends exclusively upon either Rhode Island coordinate system.

For purposes of describing the location of any survey station or land boundary corner in the state it shall be considered a complete, legal, and satisfactory description of such location to give the position of the survey station or land boundary corner on the system of plane coordinates defined in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-7

; P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 1.

34-8-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter shall be declared invalid such invalidity shall not affect any other portion of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1653, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-8-8

.

34-8-9.
Use of coordinate systems.

The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927 may be used up to and including December 31, 1989, but shall not be used thereafter. The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983 may be used up to and including December 31, 1989, and shall be the exclusive Rhode Island coordinate system thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 3.

34-8-10.
Meter-to-foot conversion.

For purposes of this chapter, and for purposes of conversion between the two (2) systems set forth in §

34-8-1

of this chapter, one meter equals 3.2808-1/3 survey feet.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 241, § 3.